North Carolina statutes. Chapter 31. Wills.
Article 9. Incorporation by Reference; Acts of Independent Significance.

§ 31-51.
Incorporation by reference.

A writing in existence when a will is executed may be incorporated by reference if the language of the will manifests this intent and describes the writing sufficiently to permit its identification.

History.

2007-184, s. 2.

OFFICIAL COMMENTS

This section codifies the common law doctrine of incorporation by reference, except that the sometimes troublesome requirement that the will refer to the document as being in existence when the will was executed has been eliminated.

§ 31-52.
Acts and events of independent significance.

A will may dispose of property by reference to acts and events that have significance apart from their effect upon the disposition made by the will, whether they occur before or after the execution of the will or before or after the testator’s death. These acts and events may include the execution or revocation of another individual’s will and the safekeeping of items in a secured depository.

History.

2007-184, s. 2.

North Carolina Comment (2007)

The concept of “safekeeping” covers both the depositing and removal of items from the depository.
Wall safes and safe deposit boxes are examples of depositories that are rebuttably presumed to be secure.

§§ 31-53 through 31-60.

Reserved for future codification purposes.